Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201981-5,205
Violation; penalty.

Any person who knowingly operates or causes to be operated an amusement ride in violation of the Nebraska Amusement Ride Act shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor. Each day a violation continues shall constitute a separate offense.

Laws 1987, LB 226, § 16;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-1816;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 41.
July 1, 2019